Illinois, session 104th, SB2620.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The amount of $50,999,828, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Illinois Power 7Agency from the Illinois Power Agency Operations Fund for its 8current and prior year ordinary and contingent expenses, as 9well as for refunds. 10    Section 10. The amount of $56,000,000 or so much thereof 11as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Illinois Power 12Agency from the Illinois Power Agency Renewable Energy 13Resources Fund for funding of current and prior fiscal year 14purchases of renewable energy resources and related expenses, 15including the refund of bidder deposit fees, refund of 16overpayments of alternative compliance payments, and expenses 17related to the development and administration of the Illinois 18Solar for All Program, pursuant to subsections (b), (c), and 19(i) of Section 1-56 of the Illinois Power Agency Act. 20    Section 15. The amount of $12,000,000, or so much thereof 21as may be necessary, is appropriated to the Illinois Power   SB2620- 2 -SDS104 00025 JMS 10025 b1Agency from the Illinois Power Agency Trust Fund for deposit 2into the Illinois Power Agency Operations Fund pursuant to 3subsection (c) of Section 6z-75 of the State Finance Act. 4ARTICLE 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 62025.